District of Columbia statutes.
24-231.10

Wages of employed prisoners; unemployment compensation.

(a)

All prisoners employed by a prison industry shall be paid wages which shall be established by the Director and approved by the Mayor. All prisoners employed by a prison industry that is approved under the PIE Program shall be paid no less than the prevailing wage for work of a similar nature in the Washington, D.C., region as determined by the District of Columbia Department of Employment Services.

(b)

Nothing in this section or elsewhere in this subchapter may be construed to create a private right, enforceable by an employed prisoner, to any wages established in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.

(c)

Employment by a prison industry shall not entitle any prisoner to the benefits authorized by Chapter 1 of Title 51, unless the prisoner is employed in a prison industry approved under the PIE Program. In the latter case, the prisoner shall not be qualified to receive any payments for unemployment compensation while incarcerated.

May 8, 1996, D.C. Law 11-117, § 11, 43 DCR 1179
This section is referenced in § 24-231.04.
1981 Ed., § 24-458.10.